Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.155

Reciprocity.

The director may, upon payment of the appropriate fees, grant a certificate of competency without examination to any applicant who is a registered journey level plumber or specialty plumber in any other state whose requirements for registration are at least substantially equivalent to the requirements of this state, and which extends the same privileges of reciprocity to journey level plumbers or specialty plumbers registered in this state.

[ 2013 c 23 s 26; 1977 ex.s. c 149 s 11.]